Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB242.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1801-H of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1801-H. Scope of article.This article relates to the tax credits to owners of agricultural assets who sell [or rent] agricultural assets to beginning farmers.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. The definitions of "department" and "lease" in section 1802-H of the act are amended to read:Section 1802-H. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Department." The Department of [Community and Economic Development] Agriculture of the Commonwealth.* * *["Lease." A written agreement between parties for the lease of real property on which farming occurs.]* * *Section 3. Sections 1803-H and 1804-H(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1803-H. Beginning farmer management tax credit.(a) General rule.--An owner of agricultural assets and a beginning farmer may each take a credit against the tax due under Article III for the sale [or rental] of agricultural assets to [a] the beginning farmer in the amount approved by the department. An owner of agricultural assets [is] and a beginning farmer are eligible for allocation as determined by the department of a tax credit equal to[:(1) five percent of the lesser of the sale price or the fair market value of the agricultural asset, up to a maximum of $32,000; or(2) ten percent of the gross rental income in each of the first, second and third years of a rental agreement, up to a maximum of $7,000 per year.] 5% of the lesser of the sale price or the fair market value of the agricultural 20250HB0242PN1720 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 asset, up to a maximum of $50,000 per farm or agricultural asset.(b) Application.--(1) The tax credit may be claimed only after approval and certification by the department and is limited to the amount stated on the certificate issued under section 1804-H.(2) An owner of agricultural assets and a beginning farmer must apply to the department for approval of a tax credit, in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The application shall:(i) identify the beginning farmer who has been certified by the department under paragraph (3) and to whom the agricultural assets are sold [or rented]; and(ii) specify whether the beginning farmer is a brother, sister, ancestor or lineal descendant of the applicant.(3) A person may apply to the department for certification that the person is a beginning farmer for purposes of this article. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and shall require that the applicant provide:(i) Projected earnings statements to demonstrate the profit potential for the farming conducted by the applicant.[(ii) Verification that the farming conducted by the applicant will be a significant source of income for the applicant.](iii) Verification that the applicant will, if certified as a beginning farmer by the department, notify the department if the farmer no longer meets the 20250HB0242PN1720 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certification and eligibility requirements within the three-year certification period, in which case eligibility for tax credits ends.(iv) Verification that [the applicant is not engaged in farming by means of a joint business venture.] the applicant is an individual, or if engaged in farming by means of a joint business venture, that each individual who is a member of the joint business venture meets the definition of a beginning farmer.(iv.1) Verification and documentation of Federal gross income from agricultural production or experience in the agriculture industry or related field within the taxable year.(v) Verification and documentation as necessary to meet other eligibility requirements as may be established by the department.(c) [Termination of rental agreement.--(1) An owner of agricultural assets or a beginning farmer may terminate a rental agreement for reasonable cause upon approval of the department.(2) If a rental agreement is terminated without the fault of the owner of agricultural assets, the tax credits shall not be retroactively disallowed.(3) In determining reasonable cause, the department shall consider which party was at fault in the termination of the agreement.(4) If the department determines the owner of agricultural assets did not have reasonable cause, the owner of agricultural assets must repay all tax credits received as a result of the rental agreement to the Commonwealth. The 20250HB0242PN1720 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 repayment is additional income tax for the taxable year in which the department makes its decision.] (Reserved).(d) [Duration] Limitation of tax credit.--The credit is limited to the liability for tax as computed under Article III [for the taxable year. The tax credit may not be sold, passed through, carried forward or refunded]. THE TAX CREDIT MAY NOT BE REFUNDED. No credits granted under this section shall be applied against any tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III.(e) Use, carryover, carryback , refund and assignment of credit.--(1) The owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer must first apply the tax credit against the tax liability for the year in which the credit is first approved. If the owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the tax liability of the owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer for those taxable years. Each time the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, it shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year. The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than three taxable years following the year in which the credit was first approved.(2) If the owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit after the application of paragraph (1), the owner of an 20250HB0242PN1720 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agricultural asset or beginning farmer , upon application to and approval by the Department of Revenue, may request a refund. The refund permitted under this paragraph may not exceed 75% of the remaining balance of the tax credit or $15,000, whichever is less.(3) (2) An owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer is not entitled to carry back, sell or assign all or any portion of an unused tax credit granted to the owner of an agricultural asset or beginning farmer under this article.(f) Beginning farmer tax credit program public awareness campaign.--The department shall establish a public awareness campaign to provide information to the general public and owners of agricultural assets concerning the availability and applicability of the tax credit.Section 1804-H. Approval of tax credit.(a) General rule.--The tax credit may be claimed only after approval and certification by the department. [The department shall review the application of a tax credit in consultation with the Department of Agriculture.]* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0242PN1720 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021